Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.560

Off-street parking space and facilities—Financing.

In order to provide for off-street parking space and/or facilities, such towns are authorized, in addition to their powers for financing public improvements, to finance their acquisition through the issuance and sale of revenue bonds and general obligation bonds. Any bonds issued by such towns pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the Constitution and the laws of this state. In addition local improvement districts may be created and their financing procedures used for this purpose in accordance with the provisions of Title 35 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. Such towns may finance from their general budget, costs of land acquisition, planning, engineering, location, design and construction to the off-street parking.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.560. Prior: 1961 c 33 s 2.]